fi: Tuetut syöttötyypit: Alakierre; Sisäänkierto; Leg spin; Off spin; Uloskierto; Satunnainen/vaihteleva; Suora/roikkupallo; Yläkierre; Muu
da: Understøttede bowlingtyper: Backspin; Inswing; Legspin; Offspin; Outswing; Tilfældig/variabel; Lige/lob; Topspin; Andet
hr-HR: Podržane vrste dostave za kuglanje: Backspin; Inswing; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Nasumično/varijabilno; Ravno/lob; Topspin; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tipuri de aruncări de bowling acceptate: Efect de retur; Inswing; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Aleatoriu/variabil; Drept/lob; Top spin; Altele
zh-CN: 支持的投球类型: 下旋; 内旋球; 腿旋球; 离旋球; 外旋球; 随机/可变; 直球/高吊球; 上旋; 其他
cs: Podporované typy hodů při bowlingu: Spodní rotace; Inswing; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Náhodný/proměnlivý; Přímý/lob; Horní rotace; Jiné
ja: 対応ボウリング投球タイプ: バックスピン; インスイング; レッグスピン; オフスピン; アウトスイング; ランダム/可変; ストレート/ロブ; トップスピン; その他
pl: Obsługiwane rodzaje kręgli: Rotacja wsteczna (backspin); Rotacja do wewnątrz (inswing); Leg spin; Off spin; Rotacja na zewnątrz (outswing); Losowy/zmienny; Prosty/lob; Rotacja przednia (topspin); Inne
vi: Các kiểu giao bóng bowling được hỗ trợ: Xoáy ngược; Xoáy trong; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Ngẫu nhiên/Biến đổi; Thẳng/Bóng bổng; Xoáy lên; Khác
fr: Types de lancers pris en charge: Effet rétro; Inswing; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Aléatoire/variable; Droit/lob; Topspin; Autre
tr: Desteklenen kriket atış türleri: Geri falso; İçe kavisli (inswing); Bacak falsosu (leg spin); Dış falso (off spin); Dışa kavisli (outswing); Rastgele/değişken; Düz/aşırtma; Üst falso (top spin); Diğer
ko: 지원되는 크리켓 투구 유형: 백스핀; 인스윙; 레그 스핀; 오프 스핀; 아웃스윙; 랜덤/변칙; 스트레이트/로브; 톱스핀; 기타
lt-LT: Palaikomi metimo tipai: Atgalinis sukimas; Vidinis sukimas (Inswing); Sukimas nuo kojos (Leg spin); Sukimas išorėn (Off spin); Išorinis sukimas (Outswing); Atsitiktinis / kintamas; Tiesus / aukštas (Lob); Viršutinis sukimas; Kitas
es: Tipos de lanzamientos compatibles: Efecto de retroceso; Efecto hacia adentro; Leg spin; Off spin; Efecto hacia afuera; Aleatorio o variable; Recto o globo; Top spin; Otro
sk-SK: Podporované typy bowlingových hodov: Spätná rotácia; Rotácia dovnútra; Leg spin; Off spin; Rotácia von; Náhodná/premenlivá; Priama/lob; Horná rotácia; Iné
sv: Typer av bowlingkast som stöds: Underskruv; Inswing; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Slumpmässig/variabel; Rak/lobb; Överskruv; Övrigt
zh-TW: 支援發球投球類型: 下旋球; 內曲球; 腿曲球; 側曲球; 外曲球; 隨機/可變; 直球/高吊球; 上旋球; 其他
th: ประเภทการส่งลูกโบว์ลิ่งที่รองรับ: สปินหลัง; อินสวิง; เลกสปิน; ออฟสปิน; เอาท์สวิง; แบบสุ่ม/ผันแปร; ลูกตรง/ลูกโด่ง; ท็อปสปิน; อื่นๆ
de: Unterstützte Bowling-Arten: Backspin; Inswing; Leg Spin; Off Spin; Outswing; Zufällig/variabel; Straight/Lob; Topspin; Sonstige
sl-SI: Podprte vrste metov v kegljanju: Spodnja rotacija; Inswing; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Naključno / spremenljivo; Ravni met / lob; Zgornji spin; Drugo
it: Tipi di lancio di bowling supportati: Back spin; Inswing; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Casuale/Variabile; Dritto/A pallonetto; Top spin; Altro
pt-BR: Tipos de lançamento de boliche compatíveis: Back spin; Inswing; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Aleatório/variável; Reto/lob; Top spin; Outros
ru: Поддерживаемые типы подачи: Обратное вращение; Инсвинг; Лег-спин; Офф-спин; Аутсвинг; Случайная/переменная; Прямая/навесом; Топ-спин; Другое
hu: Támogatott dobástípusok: Hátrapörgés; Befelé csavarodó; Leg spin; Off spin; Kifelé csavarodó; Véletlenszerű/változó; Egyenes/ívelt; Felsőpörgés; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipos de lançamentos de bowling suportados: Rotação invertida; Balanço para dentro; Rotação lateral (leg spin); Rotação lateral (off spin); Balanço para fora; Aleatório/variável; Em linha reta/balão; Rotação superior; Outro
nl: Ondersteunde bowlingtypes: Backspin; Inswing; Legspin; Offspin; Outswing; Willekeurig/variabel; Recht/lob; Topspin; Overig
nb: Støttede bowlingleveringstyper: Underskru; Innsving; Legspin; Offspin; Utsving; Tilfeldig/variabel; Rett/lobb; Toppskru; Annet
en: Supported bowling delivery types: Back spin; Inswing; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Random/variable; Straight/lob; Top spin; Other
bg-BG: Поддържани типове подаване при крикет: Обратен фалц; Инсуинг; Лег спин; Оф спин; Аутсуинг; Произволно/променливо; Право/високо (лоб); Топ спин; Друго
el: Υποστηριζόμενοι τύποι παράδοσης μπόουλινγκ: Back spin; Inswing; Leg spin; Off spin; Outswing; Τυχαίο/μεταβλητό; Ευθεία/λόμπα; Top spin; Άλλο